California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

56863.

This chapter does not apply to any market in Los Angeles County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registered Unloaders [56891. - 56893.]

56891.

Every person who unloads any farm product in a market and who is a registered unloader shall register his name, Federal Social Security number, and address and union affiliation, if any, with the commissioner. The commissioner shall supply each registered unloader with a card of registration. Each registered unloader shall carry such card at all times while employed or seeking employment in unloading any farm product in a market. A person within the definition of the term registered unloader shall not unload any farm product in a market unless he is registered as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56892.

Every producer who transports any farm product to a market may register himself or herself, his or her parents, and his or her sons or daughters, and regular full-time employees, with the commissioner. Such registration shall show the name of the producer, the registration number and other means of identification of his or her own personally owned vehicles, and the relationship of the registrant to the producer.

This chapter does not prohibit a person so registered from unloading any farm product from a vehicle as to which he or she is so registered, and no such person is required to employ any other person to unload or assist in unloading such farm product nor to pay for any services which are not requested to be performed. The commissioner shall supply each such registrant with an appropriate card, which the registrant shall carry at all times while engaged in unloading any farm product at a market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

56893.

Every produce dealer that operates in a market is responsible for providing that registered unloaders sufficient in number to do the work which is required are available at all times when any farm product is being delivered to his place of business. He is also responsible for having on hand at his place of business at all such times a responsible person to receipt for any farm product which is unloaded at his place of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Association of Produce Dealers [56921. - 56923.]

56921.

In order to facilitate the carrying out of their responsibilities pursuant to this chapter, the produce dealers that operate in a market may organize an association. A produce dealer shall not be required to become or to be a member of such association, but any such association shall admit to membership any produce dealer that operates in the market. If a produce dealer is admitted to membership in the association, he shall not be subject to any assessment or payment except those which are necessary to carry out his responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56922.

An association may do all of the following:

(a) Obtain a dispatching service from which registered unloaders may be sent to the places where their services are required.

(b) Act as the bargaining agent to establish with a union the scale of charges for unloading any farm product in the market in accordance with this chapter. 

(c) Provide for watchman service to protect and give a receipt for any farm product which is delivered to a market at times when the market is not otherwise in operation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56923.

The costs of services of an association to its members for carrying out any of the activities which are provided for or required by this chapter are subject to review by the director. No cost or expenditure for any other purpose shall be payable by any produce dealer except on an entirely voluntary basis.

The director shall from time to time on his own motion, or at the request of a produce dealer, review the activities of the association to determine if any charge is made against any produce dealer in violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Charges for Unloading Produce [56951. - 56959.]

56951.

Each produce dealer that operates within a market shall establish a scale of charges for unloading any farm product which is transported to his place of business and shall post and maintain a legible copy of such scale in a conspicuous place at his place of business where it is readily visible at all times during which any farm product is delivered to such place of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56952.

Any scale of charges which is established pursuant to this article may be modified from time to time in accordance with the method and procedure which is prescribed for establishing such scale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56953.

The scale of charges which is established shall be the standard charge for unloading any farm product in the market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56954.

A person shall not charge or receive any payment for unloading any farm product in excess of the standard charge which is established for the market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56955.

The scale of charges shall be established as follows:

(a) If all the produce dealers in a market, or a majority of such produce dealers, either individually or through group representation, have an agreement with a union, the scale of charges shall be that which is prescribed in such agreement and approved as provided in this chapter. If an agreement which covers any employees of produce dealers in a market does not cover persons who unload farm products, the agreement shall be modified, or a new agreement made, to cover such persons.

(b) If there is no such union, the scale of charges shall be fixed by the produce dealers that operate within the market.

In either event, the scale of charges is subject to the approval of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56956.

Upon the determination of a scale of charges for a market, the scale of charges shall be transmitted to the director. The director shall examine such scale and shall compare it with any available information relative to the charges for similar work which is performed under similar conditions in the city in, or for, which the market is operated. The director may take into consideration any and all factors which are relevant to the determination of the reasonableness of such charges, including any rates of the Public Utilities Commission for the performance of work of a similar nature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56957.

If the director determines that the scale of charges is not unreasonable, he shall approve the scale and thereafter the scale of charges shall be the standard charge for unloading any farm product in the market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967.   Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56958.

If the director finds that the scale of charges is unreasonable, he shall fix a time and place for a hearing on the matter.

Notice of such hearing shall be mailed to each produce dealer that operates in the market and to the officials of the union, if a union is involved. The director may also notify any or all producers of any farm product which is delivered to the market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56959.

At the hearing the director shall consider any relevant matters that may be presented and, at or after the conclusion of such hearing, he shall so adjust the scale or any item of the scale so that the scale is not unreasonably higher than the prevailing rate for similar work which is performed under similar conditions in the city or its vicinity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Penalties [56981. - 56982.]

56981.

The violation of any provision of this chapter by any person is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56982.

The violation of any provision of this chapter by a produce dealer is grounds for the revocation of his license, and the violation of any provision of this chapter by an association is grounds for the revocation of the license of each produce dealer that participates in such violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. Produce Markets in Alameda, San Francisco, and San Mateo Counties [57001. - 57043.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [57001. - 57013.]

57001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57002.

“Association” means an association of produce dealers which is organized to carry out the responsibilities of produce dealers which are imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57003.

“City” includes city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57004.

“Commissioner,” with respect to any matter which relates to a particular market, means the deputy labor commissioner who is in charge of the office of the Labor Commissioner which is located nearest to that market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57005.

“Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57007.

“Farm product” means any fruit, nut, vegetable, berry, or aquacultural product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

57008.

“Hauler” means any trucker or carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57009.

“Market” means the places of business, collectively, of produce dealers that operate in a city, or the vicinity of a city, and that deal in any farm product which is intended, in whole or in part, for ultimate sale for consumption in a fresh state within the city and the vicinity of the city. This chapter applies only to any market in which five or more produce dealers operate in the Counties of Alameda, San Francisco, and San Mateo and the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 56801) of this division shall not be applicable to any such market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57010.

“Produce dealer” includes “commission merchant,” as defined in Section 56105, and “dealer,” as defined in Section 56107. It does not, however, include a “broker,” as defined in Section 56103, nor “processor,” as defined in Section 55407.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57011.

“Producer” means any person who commercially grows and markets farm products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57012.

“Registered unloader” means a person who unloads any farm product in a market. It does not, however, include any of the following:

(a) A producer of farm products, or his son or daughter, father or mother, or regularly employed employee of such producer.

(b) The operator of any vehicle which is engaged in the transportation of any farm product to market if the operation of such vehicle is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission and the rate which is charged for such transportation includes the charge for unloading the farm product which is so transported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57013.

“Union” means the labor union which has been recognized by the National Labor Relations Board, or other governmental agency which has jurisdiction, as the bargaining agency for employees who are employed in a market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions and Exceptions [57015. - 57018.]

57015.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote the orderly marketing of farm products and the establishment of reasonable charges for unloading such products at markets in this state. It is declared that in some of the markets of this state the charges for unloading farm products have been found to be exorbitant and unreasonable and that this chapter is enacted to remedy such evils and in the interests of the public welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57016.

The director may make such regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out this chapter and to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57017.

This chapter does not apply to any market in which less than five produce dealers operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57018.

This chapter does not apply to any produce dealer at whose place of business every farm product which is delivered is unloaded without charge by employees of the produce dealer either with or without the assistance of the operator of the vehicle which transports such product or other persons who accompany the operator on such vehicle. This chapter does not prohibit any employee of a produce dealer from assisting in unloading any farm product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registered Unloaders [57021. - 57024.]

57021.

Every person who unloads any farm product in a market and who is a registered unloader shall register his name, federal social security number, and address and union affiliation, if any, with the commissioner. The commissioner shall supply each registered unloader with a badge of registration. Each registered unloader shall wear such badge at all times while employed or seeking employment in unloading any farm product in a market. A person within the definition of the term registered unloader shall not unload any farm product in a market unless he is registered as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57022.

Every producer who transports any farm product to a market may register himself, his father or mother, and his sons or daughters, and regular full-time employees, with the commissioner. Such registration shall show the name of the producer and the relationship of the registrant to the producer. The commissioner shall supply each such registrant with an appropriate badge, which the registrant shall wear at all times while engaged in unloading any farm product at a market.

This chapter does not prohibit a person from unloading any farm product, and no person is required to employ any other person to unload or assist in unloading such farm product nor to pay for any services which are not requested to be performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57023.

Every produce dealer that operates in a market is responsible for having on hand at his place of business a responsible person to receipt for any farm product which is unloaded at his place of business during posted receiving hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 712.)
-------------------------------------------

57024.

All vehicles shall be unloaded in a timely manner and in the order in which they arrive at the market, when the vehicles are unloaded by registered unloaders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Association of Produce Dealers [57025. - 57028.]

57025.

In order to facilitate the carrying out of their responsibilities pursuant to this chapter, the produce dealers that operate in a market may organize an association. A produce dealer shall not be required to become or to be a member of such association, but any such association shall admit to membership any produce dealer that operates in the market. If a produce dealer is admitted to membership in the association, he shall not be subject to any assessment or payment except those which are necessary to carry out his responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57027.

An association may provide for watchman service to protect and give a receipt for any farm product which is delivered to a market at times when the market is not otherwise in operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57028.

The costs of services of an association to its members for carrying out any of the activities which are provided for or required by this chapter are subject to review by the director. No cost or expenditure for any other purpose shall be payable by any produce dealer except on an entirely voluntary basis.

The director shall from time to time on his own motion, or at the request of a produce dealer, review the activities of the association to determine if any charge is made against any produce dealer in violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Charges for Unloading Produce [57031. - 57039.]

57031.

(a) Any union representing registered unloaders is authorized and entitled to bargain with the employer of the registered unloaders to establish a scale of charges for unloading produce.

(b) If the union or unions representing registered unloaders and the employer of registered unloaders are unable to agree on a scale of charges, the Public Employment Relations Board shall mediate the dispute pursuant to Section 3601 of the Government Code.

(c) The scale of charges in effect on December 31, 1978, shall remain in effect until new charges are established pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 3.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

57032.

The scale of charges which is established shall be the standard charge for unloading any farm product in the market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57033.

A person shall not charge or receive any payment for unloading any farm product in excess of the standard charge which is established for the market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57034.

Each produce dealer shall post and maintain a legible copy of the effective scale of charges established under this article in a conspicuous place at his place of business where it is readily visible at all times during which any farm product is delivered to such place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57035.

The commissioner or his representative shall investigate any complaint brought to his attention involving produce dealers or registered unloaders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57036.

If a scale of charges is not established pursuant to bargaining as provided for in Section 57031, the union may propose a scale of charges for approval by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 424, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

57037.

After receipt of the scale of charges proposed by the union pursuant to Section 57036, the director shall fix a time and place for a hearing on the matter. Notice of the hearing shall be published and mailed to each produce dealer in the Counties of Alameda and San Mateo and in the City and County of San Francisco and to the union. The director shall also notify any or all haulers and producers of any farm product which is delivered to the market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 424, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

57038.

(a) At the hearing the director shall consider any relevant matters that may be presented.

(b) At or after the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall determine whether or not the proposed scale is reasonable. If the director determines that the proposed scale is reasonable, the director shall approve it and thereafter that scale of charges shall be the standard charge for unloading any farm product in the market. If the director determines that the scale is unreasonable, the director shall adjust the scale or any item of the scale so that the scale is not unreasonably higher than the prevailing rate for similar work which is performed under similar conditions. After this adjustment, the scale shall be the standard charge for unloading any farm product in the market.

(c) In making the determination and, if necessary, the adjustment required in subdivision (b), the director shall compare the scale proposed by the union with any available information relating to the charges for similar work which is performed under similar conditions in the city in, or for, which the market is operated. The director may take into consideration any rates set by the Public Utilities Commission for the performance of work of a similar nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 424, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

57039.

The director may by regulation establish a fee in the amount necessary to cover the costs that are incurred by the Department of Industrial Relations in implementing this article. Each party participating in a hearing conducted pursuant to this article shall pay an equal share of the fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 424, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Penalties [57041. - 57043.]

57041.

Violation of any provision of this chapter or laws affecting personal injury or property damage by a produce dealer or registered unloader is grounds for license or registration revocation or suspension.

Before suspending or revoking any registration or license under this chapter, the commissioner shall afford the holder of such registration or license an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

57042.

The director may assess a fee not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) per year payable by produce dealers for use exclusively in administering the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 470.)
-------------------------------------------

57043.

The violation of any provision of this chapter by any person is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Dairy Produce Exchanges [57101. - 57222.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [57101. - 57103.]

57101.

“Dairy produce exchange” means any association of persons which is organized for the following purposes:

(a) Furnishing a medium for trading in butter, cheese, or eggs.

(b) Facilitating the marketing of any such product.

(c) Establishing the wholesale market value of any such product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57102.

The director may require such monthly or other periodical reports, records of market quotations, and other statistical information as may be necessary to him in administering this chapter. All such reports, statistics, or information which is pertinent to each dairy produce exchange which is licensed pursuant to this chapter shall be kept on file in the office of the director and subject to public inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57103.

The director shall have access to all records of every dairy produce exchange which is licensed pursuant to this chapter, and may appoint a representative to sit with the board of directors or other governing body of such exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licenses [57131. - 57134.]

57131.

It is unlawful for any person to establish or operate a dairy produce exchange unless he has first obtained from the director a license to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57132.

Every dairy produce exchange, and any person that desires to operate a dairy produce exchange, before engaging in such activity, shall file with the director a written application for a license, accompanied by the license fee which is prescribed by Section 57134. The application shall state all of the following information:

(a) The name under which the dairy produce exchange proposes to operate.

(b) The location of its place of business.

(c) The names of its officers, directors, and the persons, firms, corporations, or associations which constitute its membership.

(d) A certified copy of its articles of incorporation, its constitution and bylaws, and the rules and regulations and bases of trade under which it proposes to operate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57133.

The director shall examine the application, and if he finds that the applicant has fully complied with the provisions of this chapter, he shall issue a license which authorizes the applicant to operate a dairy produce exchange. The license shall recite in bold type that the issuance of the license is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the rules and regulations or bases of trade under which the applicant proposes to operate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57134.

For each license, the director shall charge the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), which sum shall accompany the application for the license. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each license which is issued by the director shall continue in effect so long as the licensee shall continue in business, and shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) annually to the director. Such fee is payable on the first Monday of each calendar year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Arbitration [57161. - 57165.]

57161.

The director shall act as arbitrator in all cases of dispute or contention which concerns the maintenance or operation of any licensed dairy produce exchange, or the bylaws, rules, or regulations which pertain to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57162.

Upon receipt of any verified complaint which concerns a licensed dairy produce exchange, the director shall proceed to make a thorough investigation. In this connection, the director:

(a) May conduct hearings, of which all interested parties shall receive due notice, and may require written statements which set forth the views of any or all contending parties.

(b) Shall invite the cooperation and solicit the opinion of the Federal Trade Commission and the Economic Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57163.

On the basis of the information which is so obtained, the director shall prescribe a tentative rule which shall be effective in the operation of any licensed dairy produce exchange for not to exceed 90 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57164.

If, after such trial period, it appears that the tentative rule operates in a fair and equitable manner, it shall then, upon order of the director, be made a permanent rule of such licensed dairy produce exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57165.

If, in the conduct of any such investigation, it appears that any unlawful act has been committed by any licensed dairy produce exchange, the director may initiate appropriate legal proceedings against such exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigations, Hearings, and Suspension or Revocation of Licenses [57191. - 57193.]

57191.

The director may upon his own motion, and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any dairy produce exchange and may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke any license which is issued pursuant to this chapter if the licensee is guilty of any of the following:

(a) Failure to supply all the information which is required by subdivisions a, b, c, and d of Section 57132.

(b) Making any false statement or misrepresentation of fact to the director. 

(c) Fraud or deception in the application for or procurement of a license.

(d) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character than the conduct which is specified in this section, which is unlawful.

(e) Violation of any law or ordinance of the state or any city or county or the rules of the Federal Trade Commission which govern unfair trade practices in the handling of butter, cheese, or eggs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57192.

The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers which are granted in that chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57193.

If judicial review of the decision of the director is sought, the decision of the director shall remain in effect pending the determination of the review, unless the party that seeks the review files with the court a bond in a sum to be fixed by the court, in favor of the people and conditioned upon the faithful performance of all those things which are ordered to be done, or the faithful observance of such restraint as may be directed by the director. The bond shall be for the benefit of any person that has dealings with the person that seeks the review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 235.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Violations and Penalties [57221. - 57222.]

57221.

Any person that operates a dairy produce exchange without a license is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall also pay to the state one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every day of such operation. Any money which is due the state pursuant to this section shall be recovered by an action at law brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

57222.

Any person that makes any false statement in applying for a license or violates any rule or decision of the director which is authorized by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Private Produce Inspection [57301. - 57309.]

57301.

The commissioner shall require any person, except a county, state, or federal inspection agency, who, for payment by a private party, reports upon the condition of lots of fresh fruits or vegetables offered for sale other than for processing to register with the commissioner. The commissioner shall maintain a registry of these persons which shows the name and business address, market or markets at which inspections are made, the products inspected, and additional matters that the commissioner requires. The commissioner shall forward this information to the director who shall maintain a central registry on a statewide basis. A produce inspector who is registered in one county where he or she does business may do business in any other county without registering in the other county if the commissioner in the other county is provided proof of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57302.

The board of supervisors may, pursuant to this chapter, establish a registration fee in an amount necessary to cover the actual costs of the commissioner for that registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57303.

Each registered inspector shall maintain a copy of each written report of the date, lot description, volume, and condition of the commodity inspected. Condition shall include the grade or other criteria used to evaluate the product. If a report has been made orally, a written confirmation shall be prepared within 24 hours and retained in the same manner as a written report. Reports need not name the person to whom the advice was given, but the names shall be maintained so that they may be matched to the respective reports upon request of the commissioner. Reports shall be maintained for a period of not less than 90 days and shall be made available to the commissioner upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57304.

If the commissioner or the director receives a complaint from an interested party that any report required to be kept by Section 57303 is materially inaccurate, the commissioner may investigate the matter and shall give a report of findings to all interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57305.

The remedies or penalties in this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57306.

If the commissioner finds that a registered inspector has repeatedly given inaccurate information or failed to maintain required records, the commissioner may, after a hearing, cancel or suspend the registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57307.

(a) Any person who violates this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General at the request of the director. Any funds recovered pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) An action may also be brought pursuant to this section by the district attorney at the request of the commissioner in the county in which the offense occurred. Any funds recovered pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57308.

It is unlawful for any person to act as a registered inspector unless currently registered by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

57309.

It is unlawful for any person to misrepresent the quality of any commodity inspected or to fail to make and maintain the records required by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1039, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Dairy Cattle Supply Lien [57401. - 57414.]

57401.

(a) The definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(b) “Feed or materials” means commercial feed, grain, forage, feed ingredients, mineral feed, drugs, animal health products, customer-formula feed, any mixture or preparation for feeding animals, any of the constituent nutrients of an animal ration, or any other food which is used for the feeding of dairy cattle.

(c) “Person obligated on any proceeds” means a handler, as defined in Section 61826, who is in possession of proceeds.

(d) “Proceeds” means funds
 derived from the sale of milk or milk products which are payable to the lien debtor by the possessor of the funds, except for any of the following:

(1) Deductions for taxes, fees, and assessments.

(2) Funds due or owing milk processing cooperative associations organized and operating pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001).

(3) Funds retained by the cooperative association.

(4) Deductions made pursuant to a court order.

(5) Deductions due or owing the buyer of the milk for hauling
 services provided by the buyer pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 62096 and deductions due or owing the buyer for the testing of milk for purposes of payment pursuant to Section 34231.

(e) “Raising or maintaining of dairy cattle” means feeding, pasturing, caring for, and managing dairy cattle kept or raised for use or profit.

(f) “Reasonable or agreed charges” means the agreed price, if any, for the feed and materials sold to the lien debtor, at the lien debtor’s request. If there is no agreed price or a method for determining price which is agreed upon, “reasonable or agreed charges” means the reasonable value of the feed or materials as of the date of delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   (SB 592)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

57402.

A person who provides feed or materials to aid the raising or maintaining of dairy cattle or offspring therefrom has a lien upon the proceeds of the milk or milk products produced from the dairy cattle, for the reasonable or agreed charges for the feed or materials provided and for the costs of enforcing the lien. However, the amount of charges secured by the lien cannot exceed an amount equal to the reasonable or agreed charges for feed or material provided within a 60-day period, and only two providers of feed or materials shall have an enforceable lien at any time according to the priority set forth in Section 57406. Only one lien
 under this chapter per dairy producer is available per affiliated business supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 309, Sec. 2.   (SB 592)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

57403.

(a) The lien created pursuant to this chapter attaches to proceeds. 
